test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-salaaj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - salāj: # Noun 225 'eng /est varas/fin' - full paradigm
     salāj+N+Sg+Nom: salāj
     salāj+N+Sg+Gen: salāj
     salāj+N+Sg+Par: salājt
     salāj+N+Sg+Dat: salājõn
     salāj+N+Sg+Ins: salājõks
     salāj+N+Sg+Ill: salājõ
     salāj+N+Sg+Ela: salājst
     salāj+N+Pl+Nom: salājd
     salāj+N+Pl+Gen: salājd
     salāj+N+Pl+Par: salājḑi
     salāj+N+Pl+Dat: salājdõn
     salāj+N+Pl+Ins: salājdkõks
     salāj+N+Pl+Ill: salājži
     salāj+N+Pl+Ela: salājšti
